Illinois, session 104th, HB3983.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Housing Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (310 ILCS 5/1)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 151)7    Sec. 1. This act shall be known as the the "State Housing 8Act."9(Source: Laws 1933, p. 396.)